Hawaii statutes.
[§91-2.6] Proposed rulemaking actions and
rules; posting on the lieutenant governor's internet website. (a)
Beginning January 1, 2000, all state agencies, through the office of the
lieutenant governor, shall make available on the website of the office of the
lieutenant governor each proposed rulemaking action of the agency and the full
text of the agency's proposed rules or changes to existing rules. The internet
website shall provide instructions regarding how to download the information
regarding proposed rulemaking actions and the full text of the agency's
proposed rules.

(b) Each state agency, to the greatest extent
feasible, shall:

(1) Ensure that all information pertaining to that
agency that is contained on the lieutenant governor's website is current and
accurate; and

(2) Advise individuals contacting the state agency of
the availability of the proposed rulemaking actions and the full text of the
agency's proposed rules on the lieutenant governor's website. [L 1999, c 301,
pt of §2(1)]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next